Utah statutes.
17C-4-203.   Requirement to file a copy of the resolution or interlocal
agreement -- County payment of tax increment to the agency.
(1)  Each agency that is to receive funds under a resolution or interlocal
agreement under Section 17C-4-201 shall, within 30 days after the effective
date of the resolution or interlocal agreement, file a copy of it with:
(a)  the State Tax Commission, the State Board of Education, and the state
auditor; and
(b)  the auditor of the county in which the project area is located, if the
resolution or interlocal agreement provides for the agency to receive tax
increment from the taxing entity or public entity that adopted the resolution
or entered into the interlocal agreement.
(2)  Each county that collects property tax on property within a community
development project area shall, in the manner and at the time provided in
Section 59-2-1365, pay and distribute to the agency the tax increment that the
agency is entitled to receive under a resolution approved or an interlocal
agreement adopted under Section 17C-4-201.
